test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-paart_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - па̄рт: # Noun 122 'eng board /rus доска' - full paradigm
#
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Nom: па̄рт
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Lat: па̄ртын     
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Loc: па̄ртыт
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Abl: па̄ртныл
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Ins: па̄ртыл      
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Tra: па̄ртыг      
     па̄рт+N+Du+Nom: па̄ртыг      
     па̄рт+N+Du+Lat: па̄ртыгн 
     па̄рт+N+Du+Loc: па̄ртыгт      
     па̄рт+N+Du+Abl: па̄ртыгныл
     па̄рт+N+Du+Ins: па̄ртыгтыл      
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Nom: па̄ртыт      
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Lat: па̄ртытн 
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Loc: па̄ртытт      
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Abl: па̄ртытныл
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Ins: па̄ртытыл      

     па̄рт+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: па̄ртум
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: па̄ртын
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: па̄ртэ
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [па̄ртме̄н, па̄ртмен]
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: па̄рты̄н
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: па̄ртэ̄н
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: па̄ртув
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: па̄рты̄н
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: па̄ртаныл
     па̄рт+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: па̄ртагум
     па̄рт+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: па̄ртагын
     па̄рт+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: па̄ртаге
     па̄рт+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: па̄ртагме̄н
     па̄рт+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: па̄ртагы̄н
     па̄рт+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: па̄ртаге̄н
     па̄рт+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: па̄ртагув
     па̄рт+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: па̄ртагы̄н
     па̄рт+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: па̄ртаганыл
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: па̄ртанум
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: па̄ртанын
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: па̄ртанэ
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: па̄ртанме̄н
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: па̄ртаны̄н
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: па̄ртанэ̄н
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: па̄ртанув
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: па̄ртаны̄н
     па̄рт+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: па̄ртананыл
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: па̄ртумт
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: па̄ртынт
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: па̄ртэт
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: па̄ртме̄нт
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: па̄рты̄нт
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: па̄ртэ̄нт
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: па̄ртувт
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: па̄рты̄нт
     па̄рт+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: па̄ртанылт
